Hawaii statutes.
[§634-28] Form of judgment. The
judgment rendered in such a cause shall be in form a personal judgment against
the defendant or defendants, but shall not be valid, except for the purpose of
the issuance of the levy of execution and of sale upon the property so
attached. [L 1917, c 67, §2; RL 1925, §2346; RL 1935, §4082; RL 1945, §10064;
RL 1955, §230-35; HRS §634-62; ren HRS §634-28]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 64, 69.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next